apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="sk/eiñ__vblex">
      <e><p><l>eiñ</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oet</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oan</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oez</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oomp</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oit</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oont</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oer</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oen</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oes</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oe</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oemp</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oec’h</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oent</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oed</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ois</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ojout</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oas</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ojomp</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ojoc’h</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ojont</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ojod</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oin</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oi</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oo</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oimp</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oot</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oint</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oor</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ofen</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ofes</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ofe</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ofemp</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ofec’h</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ofent</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ofed</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ojen</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ojes</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oje</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ojemp</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ojec’h</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ojent</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ojed</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oomp</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oit</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oent</l><r>eiñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="gwallskeiñ"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>allsk</i><par n="sk/eiñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="skeiñ"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/eiñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="teiñ"><par n="initial-t"/><i></i><par n="sk/eiñ__vblex"/></e>
